Maryland, session 2025, HB1307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 5–104 of Article – Criminal Procedure of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1307*

HOUSE BILL 1307
Article – Criminal Procedure
5–104.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3–201 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(3) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
CERTIFIED BY THE MARYLAND POLICE TRAINING AND STANDARDS COMMISSION
UNDER § 3–209 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(B) IF REQUESTED BY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES, A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENT, OR LOCAL DETENTION
FACILITY SHALL:
(1) NOTIFY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES:
(I) THAT THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENT, OR LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY HAS TAKEN CUSTODY OF AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF AN OUTSTANDING CRIMINAL WARRANT; AND
(II) OF THE DETAILS OF THE CUSTODY, INCLUDING, IF
APPLICABLE, INFORMATION REGARDING THE PLANNED RELEASE OF THE
INDIVIDUAL;
(2) RETAIN CUSTODY OF ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF AN
OUTSTANDING CRIMINAL WARRANT FOR UP TO 48 HOURS BEYOND THE PLANNED
RELEASE OF THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(3) COOPERATE WITH FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES TO
ARRANGE FOR THE TRANSFER OF ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF AN
OUTSTANDING CRIMINAL WARRANT TO FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL IS A PRIORITY FOR REMOVAL, CONSISTENT
WITH THE ENFORCEMENT PRIORITIES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND
SECURITY.
(C) DURING AN INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SECTION, A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENT, OR LOCAL DETENTION
FACILITY SHALL PROVIDE AN INTERPRETER FOR ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO REQUIRES
ONE TO EFFECTIVELY COMMUNICATE.

HOUSE BILL 1307 3
(D) THE STATE, A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A COUNTY SHERIFF, OR AN
AGENCY OF THE STATE OR A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NOT ADOPT,
IMPLEMENT, OR ENFORCE ANY POLICY THAT LIMITS OR PROHIBITS COOPERATION
WITH FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES IN THE INVESTIGATION OR
APPREHENSION OF INDIVIDUALS NOT LAWFULLY PRESENT IN THE UNITED STATES
WHO ARE THE SUBJECT OF OUTSTANDING CRIMINAL WARRANTS.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.